test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_rappadas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - rappâdâš:
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Nom:  rappâdâš
   rappâdâš+A+Attr: rappâdis
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Gen:  rappâdáá
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Acc:  rappâdáá
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Ill:  rappâdâžân
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Loc:  rappâdáást
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Com:  rappâdáin
   rappâdâš+N+Sg+Abe:  rappâdááttáá
   rappâdâš+N+Ess:  rappâdâžžân
   rappâdâš+N+Par:  rappâdâžžâd
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Nom:  rappâdááh
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Gen:  rappâdái
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Acc:  rappâdáid
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Ill:  rappâdáid
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Loc:  rappâdáin
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Com:  rappâdáiguin
   rappâdâš+N+Pl+Abe:  rappâdáittáá
